Hawaii statutes.
§302D-13 Start-up and conversion charter
schools; establishment. (a) New start-up and conversion charter schools
may be established pursuant to this section.

(b) Any community, department school, school
community council, group of teachers, group of teachers and administrators, or
nonprofit organization may submit a letter of intent to an authorizer to form a
charter school and establish an applicant governing board. An applicant
governing board may develop a charter application pursuant to this section;
provided that:

(1) An applicant governing board established by a
community may develop a charter application for a start-up charter school;

(2) An applicant governing board established by a
department school or a school community council may develop a charter
application for a conversion charter school;

(3) An applicant governing board established by a
group of teachers or a group of administrators may develop a charter
application for a start-up or conversion charter school; and

(4) A nonprofit organization may:

(A) Establish an applicant governing board
that is separate from the nonprofit organization and develop a charter
application for a start-up or conversion charter school; or

(B) Establish an applicant governing board
that shall be the board of directors of the nonprofit organization and may
develop a charter application for a conversion charter school; provided that
any nonprofit organization that seeks to manage and operate a conversion
charter school shall:

(i) Submit to the authorizer at the time of
the charter application bylaws or policies that describe the manner in which
business is conducted and policies that relate to the management of potential
conflict of interest situations;

(ii) Have experience in the management and operation
of public or private schools or, to the extent necessary, agree to obtain
appropriate services from another entity or entities possessing such
experience;

(iii) Not interfere in the operations of the
department school to be converted until otherwise authorized by the authorizer
in consultation with the department; and

(iv) Have the same protections that are
afforded to all other governing boards in its role as the conversion charter
school governing board.

(c) The charter school application process and
schedule shall be determined by the authorizer, and shall provide for and
include, at a minimum, the following elements:

(1) The issuance and publication of a request for
proposals by the authorizer on the authorizer's internet website that, at a
minimum:

(A) Solicits charter applications and
presents the authorizer's strategic vision for chartering;

(B) Includes or directs applicant governing
boards to the performance framework developed by the authorizer in accordance
with section 302D-16;

(C) Includes criteria that will guide the
authorizer's decision to approve or deny a charter application;

(D) States clear, appropriately detailed
questions and provides guidelines concerning the format and content essential
for applicant governing boards to demonstrate the capacities necessary to
establish and operate a successful charter school; and

(E) Requires charter applications to provide
or describe all essential elements, as determined by the authorizer, of
proposed school plans;

(2) The submission of a letter of intent to open and
operate a start-up charter school or to convert a department school to a
conversion charter school;

(3) The timely submission of a completed charter
application to the authorizer; provided that a charter application for a
conversion charter school shall include certification and documentation that
the charter application was approved by a majority of the votes cast by
existing administrative, support, and teacher personnel, and parents of
students at the existing department school; provided that:

(A) This vote shall be considered by the
authorizer to be the primary indication of the existing administrative,
support, and teaching personnel, and parents' approval to convert to a charter
school;

(B) The balance of stakeholders represented
in the vote and the extent of support received in support of the conversion
shall be key factors, along with the applicant's proposed plans, to be
considered by the authorizer when deciding whether to award a charter; and

(C) A breakdown of the number of
administrative, support, and teaching personnel, and parents of students who
constitute the existing department school and the number who actually
participated in the vote shall be provided to the authorizer;

(4) The timely review of the charter application by
the authorizer for completeness, and notification by the authorizer to the
applicant governing board that the charter application is complete;

(5) Upon receipt of a completed charter application,
the review and evaluation of the charter application by qualified persons
including but not limited to:

(A) An in-person interview with
representatives from the applicant governing board; and

(B) An opportunity in a public forum for the
public to provide input on each charter application;

(6) Following the review and evaluation of a charter
application, approval or denial of the charter application by the authorizer in
a meeting open to the public;

(7) A provision for a final date by which a decision
to approve or deny a charter application must be made by the authorizer, upon
receipt of a complete charter application; and

(8) A provision that no charter school may begin
operation before obtaining authorizer approval of its charter application and
charter contract and fulfilling pre-opening requirements that may be imposed by
the authorizer, pursuant to section 302D-14.5.

(d) A charter application to become a start-up
or conversion charter school shall meet the requirements of this subsection,
section 302D-25, and any other requirements set by the authorizer. The charter
application shall, at a minimum:

(1) Include plans for a charter school that are
likely to satisfactorily meet the academic, financial, organizational, and
operational performance indicators, measures, and metrics set forth in the
authorizer's performance framework, pursuant to section 302D-16;

(2) Include plans for a charter school that is in
compliance with applicable laws; and

(3) [Recognize] the interests of the general public.

(e) In reviewing a charter application under
this section, an authorizer shall take into consideration the constitution of
the applicant governing board, terms of applicant governing board members, and
the process by which applicant governing board members were selected.

(f) In reviewing charter applications under
this section, an authorizer shall develop a schedule to approve or deny a
charter application by the end of the calendar year prior to the opening year
of the proposed charter school for purposes of meeting any deadlines to request
funding from the legislature; provided that nothing in this section shall be
construed as requiring an authorizer to accept and review charter applications
annually.

(g) If a conflict between the provisions in
this section and other provisions in this chapter occurs, this section shall
control. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 159, §8; am L 2014, c 99, §9;
am L 2015, c 114, §5; am L 2016, c 113, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next